src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ================================ !
!! !!!Lule Sáme Proper noun morphology !
! ================================ !

! Table of content
! --------
! * Even syllable proper nouns
! ** Regular even stems
! ** 4-syllable stems
! ** Plurals
! * Odd syllable proper nouns
! ** Regular odd stems
! ** Plurals
! * Contracted proper nouns
! ** Regular contracted stems
! ** Plurals
! * Sme/sma lexicons

! V-finals stems with unstressed last syllable get an even syllable case marking. Lexicons ACCRA, GIRUNA, RONDANE, GATA, BETFAGE, MARJA and SUOBMA are for regular v-final words that work as regular even stems, with or without cg. C-final trisyllabic stems go to BASUDIS and get an even syllable case marking. Lexicons DUBAI, NYSTØ and BERN have a stressed last syllable and work like standard C-final 4-syllabic stems (like gånågis, etc) without cg, and thus get even syllable case marking

! C-final stems with unstressed last syllable get an odd syllable case marking, without without cg. This includes lexicons LONDON, JOKULL, ANAR, PIPP, DUORTNUS.

! Stems ending -oj, -åj or -es in sg.nom. get regular contracted case marking with I-III cg.


! Name lexica

!! !!Even syllable proper nouns
! =============

!! Words in ACCRA lexicons end on vowel, have no CG and get "even-syllable" case marking where case suffixes are added directly. Illative e:i, but not o:u. Last syllable is unstressed. Both non-assimilated and assmilated stems (although not all are fully, or correctly, assmilated)

LEXICON ACCRA-ani  !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Illative e changes to i. Animales.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani@U.Cap.Obl@:%>00@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRADECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Tjuorri # Even-syllable test
!!€ Tjuorri:               Tjuorri+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom
!!€ Tjuorrij:              Tjuorri+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill
!!€ Tjuorris:              Tjuorri+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela


LEXICON ACCRA-obj !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Object names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Gestapo # Even-syllable test
!!€ Gestapo:               Gestapo+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Gestapoj:              Gestapo+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Gestapos:              Gestapo+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ACCRA-org !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ACCRADECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Giellatekno # Even-syllable test
!!€ Giellatekno:               Giellatekno+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Giellateknoj:              Giellatekno+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Giellateknos:              Giellatekno+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ACCRA-mal !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case are added directly, no cg. Male names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Antonio # Even-syllable test
!!€ Antonio:               Antonio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Antonioj:              Antonio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Antonios:              Antonio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ACCRA-fem !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Female names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Barbro # Even-syllable test
!!€ Barbro:               Barbro+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Barbroj:              Barbro+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Barbros:              Barbro+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Female names also used as surnames
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            ACCRADECL ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Sara # Even-syllable test
!!€ Sara:               Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Saraj:               Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Saraj:               Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Saras:               Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ACCRA-malfem !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both female and male names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            ACCRADECL ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Janne # Even-syllable test
!!€ Janne:               Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Janne:               Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Jannij:              Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Jannes:              Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both objects and place names
        +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ACCRADECL     ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%> ACCRA-plc-der ;

LEXICON ACCRA-plc-der
@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

!!€gt-norm: Soria-Moria # Even-syllable test
!!€ Soria-Moria:               Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Soria-Moriaj:              Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Soria-Morias:              Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela
!!€ Soria-Moriaj:              Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ soria-moriak:              Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ soria-morialasj:           Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom


LEXICON ACCRA-femplc !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both female and place names
        +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> ACCRADECL     ;
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ACCRADECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%> ACCRA-plc-der ;

!!€gt-norm: Salla # Even-syllable test
!!€ Salla:               Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Salla:               Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom
!!€ Sallaj:              Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Sallas:              Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela
!!€ sallak:              Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sallalasj:           Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom

LEXICON ACCRA-sur !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Surnames
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>            ACCRADECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Tønne # Even-syllable test
!!€ Tønne:              Tønne+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Tønnij:              Tønne+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Tønnes:              Tønne+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela
