src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Anná ACCRA-fem ;
Avlá ACCRA-mal ;
Dålen-Dálla ACCRA-obj ;
Gejrá ACCRA-mal ;
Gáhti ACCRA-fem ;
Ibbá ACCRA-fem ;
Káisá ACCRA-fem ;
Láila ACCRA-fem ;
Láilá ACCRA-fem ;
meänkieli:meän#kieli ACCRA-obj ; ! XXX - er dette proper? SNM
Miná ACCRA-fem ;
Máhtu-Siggá ACCRA-fem ;
Máijá ACCRA-fem ;
Májjá ACCRA-fem ;
Nilssa ACCRA-mal ;
Pentá ACCRA-obj ;
Prokorosa ACCRA-fem ;
Sančuari:Sanču^ari ACCRA-org ;
Sapfeira ACCRA-fem ;
Sassja ACCRA-fem ;
Sera ACCRA-fem ; !village
Siggá ACCRA-fem ;
Sunná ACCRA-fem ;
Tillá ACCRA-fem ;
Tjuorri ACCRA-ani ;
Ájke ACCRA-mal ;
Ánu ACCRA-mal ;
Áššu ACCRA-org ; 
Šete ACCRA-org ;
Sančuari:Sanču^ari ACCRA-org ;
Aalto:Aalto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Adas% Dansestudio:Adas% Danse^studio9 ACCRA-org ;
Ahto:Ahto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Ailo:Ailo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Aino:Aino9 ACCRA-fem ;
Ala-Aho:Ala-Aho9 ACCRA-sur ;
Alkio:Alkio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Amerigo:Amerigo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Anzio:Anzio9 ACCRA-mal ;
Apollo:Apollo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Arkivfoto:Arkiv^foto9 ACCRA-org ;
Asko:Asko9 ACCRA-mal ;
ASVO:ASVO ACCRA-org ;
Asvo:Asvo9 ACCRA-org ;
Aunio:Aunio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Azazello:Azazello9 ACCRA-org ;
Barbro:Barbro9 ACCRA-fem ;
Bel% Canto:Bel% Canto9 ACCRA-org ;
Bengalo:Bengalo9 ACCRA-org ;
Bianco:Bi^anco9 ACCRA-sur ;
Bravo:Bravo9 ACCRA-ani ;
Bredo:Bredo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Castro:Castro9 ACCRA-sur ;
Chevron% Texaco:Chevron% Texaco9 ACCRA-org ;
ChevronTexaco:Chevron^Texaco9 ACCRA-org ;
Cicero:Cicero9 ACCRA-mal ;
Colorin-Colorado:Colorin-Colorado9 ACCRA-obj ; !an expedition
Confessio:Confessio9 ACCRA-org ;
Cupido:Cupido9 ACCRA-org ;
Dao:Dao9 ACCRA-org ;
Domino:Domino9 ACCRA-org ;
Eero:Eero9 ACCRA-mal ;
Elmo:Elmo9 ACCRA-fem ;
Enso:Enso9 ACCRA-org ;
Erkinaro:Erkin^aro9 ACCRA-sur ;
Erno:Erno9 ACCRA-mal ;
FeFo:FeFo9 ACCRA-org ;
Francesco:Francesco9 ACCRA-mal ;
Geronimo:Geronimo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Gestapo:Gestapo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Gro:Gro9 ACCRA-fem ;
Guro:Guro9 ACCRA-fem ;
Haavisto:Haavisto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Happo:Happo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Heimo:Heimo9 ACCRA-mal ; ! Finnish name
Heinisuo:Heini^suo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Hernando:Hernando9 ACCRA-mal ;
Hosio:Hosio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Hydro:Hydro9 ACCRA-org ;
Ilo:Ilo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Ilpo:Ilpo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Isosalo:Isosalo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Jaako:Jaako9 ACCRA-mal ;
Jarmo:Jarmo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Julio:Julio9 ACCRA-mal ;
Junno:Junno9 ACCRA-sur ;
Juno:Juno9 ACCRA-fem ;
Kalervo:Kalervo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Kalpio:Kalpio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Kanako:Kanako9 ACCRA-fem ;
Kauko:Kauko9 ACCRA-mal ;
Keiko:Keiko9 ACCRA-fem ;
Kelero:Kelero9 ACCRA-sur ;
Kill% Buljo:Kill% Buljo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Koivulehto:Koivu^lehto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Kojo:Kojo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Koskelo:Koskelo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Kota-Poro:Kota-Poro9 ACCRA-org ;
Käpyaho:Käpy^aho9 ACCRA-sur ;
LagasRadio:Lagas^Radio9 ACCRA-org ;
Latvalehto:Latva^lehto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Leonardo:Le^onardo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Litto:Litto9 ACCRA-org ;
Lumio:Lumio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Marcelino:Marcelino9 ACCRA-mal ;
Marko:Marko9 ACCRA-mal ;
Melbo:Mel^bo9 ACCRA-org ;
Mero:Mero9 ACCRA-sur ;
MoDo:MoDo9 ACCRA-org ;
NATO:NATO ACCRA-org ;
Navaho:Navaho9 ACCRA-obj ;
NAVO:NAVO ACCRA-obj ;
Navo:Navo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Nicko:Nicko9 ACCRA-mal ;
Niittyvuopio:Niitty^vuopio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Nordlandia% Kautokeino:Nord^landia% Kauto^keino9 ACCRA-org ;
Ono:Ono9 ACCRA-sur ;
OOSMO:OOSMO ACCRA-org ;
Otto:Otto9 ACCRA-mal ;
Peräaho:Perä^aho9 ACCRA-sur ;
Pirjo:Pirjo9 ACCRA-fem ;
Pluto:Pluto9 ACCRA-obj ;
Pohto:Pohto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Poro:Poro9 ACCRA-org ;
Pressefoto:Presse^foto9 ACCRA-obj ;
Quattro:Quat^tro9 ACCRA-obj ;
Rahko:Rahko9 ACCRA-mal ;
Railo:Railo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Rantio:Rantio9 ACCRA-sur ;
RealAudio:Real^Audio9 ACCRA-obj ;
Ricardo:Ricardo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Rikstoto:Rikstoto9 ACCRA-org ;
Roisko:Roisko9 ACCRA-sur ;
Romeo:Romeo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Ruokso:Ruokso9 ACCRA-ani ;
Rødekro:Røde^kro9 ACCRA-obj ;
Sairio:Sairio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Samfoto:Sam^foto9 ACCRA-org ;
SEFO:SEFO ACCRA-org ;
Seppo:Seppo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Sihto:Sihto9 ACCRA-sur ;
ski-doo:ski-doo9 ACCRA-obj ;
SMS% från% Soppero+CmpN/None:SMS% från% Soppero9 ACCRA-obj ;
Soisalo:Soi^salo9 ACCRA-sur ;
Storaenso:Stora^enso9 ACCRA-org ;
Suivakko:Suivakko9 ACCRA-ani ;
Sámiradio:Sámi^radio9 ACCRA-org ;
Tabasco:Tabasco9 ACCRA-obj ;
Tainio:Tainio9 ACCRA-sur ;
Tampico:Tampico9 ACCRA-mal ;
Taro:Taro9 ACCRA-ani ;
Te% Kõhanga% Reo:Te% Kõhanga% Reo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Tellervo:Tellervo9 ACCRA-fem ;
Tero:Tero9 ACCRA-mal ;
Texaco:Texaco9 ACCRA-org ;
Tuohino:Tuohino9 ACCRA-sur ;
Unesco:Unesco9 ACCRA-org ;
Uno:Uno9 ACCRA-mal ;
Verho:Verho9 ACCRA-mal ;
Vidaro:Vidaro9 ACCRA-sur ;
Vieno:Vieno9 ACCRA-fem ; !Also sur
Volvo:Volvo9 ACCRA-obj ;
Vuokko:Vuokko9 ACCRA-fem ;
Vuolteenaho:Vuolteen^aho9 ACCRA-sur ;
Webbradio:Webb^radio9 ACCRA-obj ;
Yahoo:Yahoo9 ACCRA-org ;
Ylisuvanto:Yli^suvanto9 ACCRA-sur ;
Ábo:Ábo9 ACCRA-mal ;
Šefo:Šefo9 ACCRA-org ;
